Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-118] Fraudulent enlistment,
appointment, or separation. Any person who:

(1) Procures the person's own enlistment or
appointment in the state military forces by knowingly false representation or
deliberate concealment as to the person's qualifications for that enlistment or
appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

(2) Procures the person's own separation from the
state military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate
concealment as to the person's eligibility for that separation;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next